Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2817.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.49, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Athletic team designations. new text end new text begin (a) A school sponsored interscholastic, intramural, or club athletic team must be expressly designated as, and composed of students of, only one of the following categories of team members based on biological sex at birth: new text end new text begin (1) males; new text end new text begin (2) females; or new text end new text begin (3) coed. new text end new text begin (b) The membership of athletic teams or sports designated for females must only be open to participants who were biological females at birth. new text end